Ohio, session 136, HB1016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.623 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.623. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound lanes of state route number fifty-seven between chestnut ridge road and west river road, in Lorain county, shall be known as the "Army Sgt. Daniel Michael Shepherd Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.